src/morphology/affixes/digits.lexc
LEXICON DIGITS_KUUSI
!! The digit strings ending in digit 6 pronounced as number
!!€ 6:
!!€ 6:t:
!!€ 6:ss:
0  DIGITS_COMPOUND   ;
+Sg+Nom:0    #   ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  DIGITS_BACK_POSS    ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  DIGITS_BACK_CLIT   ;
+Pl+Nom:%:t DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Gen:%:n DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Par:%:ta    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ill:%:een   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
+Sg+Abe:%:tta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Abl:%:lta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ade:%:lla   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+All:%:lle   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ela:%:sta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ess:%:na    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ine:%:ssa   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:ksi   DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Tra:%:kse   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
+Pl+Par:%:ia    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ill:%:iin   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
+Pl+Abe:%:itta  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Abl:%:ilta  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ade:%:illa  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+All:%:ille  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ess:%:ina   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Cmt:%:ine  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ela:%:ista  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ine:%:issa  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ins:%:in    DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:iksi  DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:ikse  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;

LEXICON DIGITS_SEITSEMÄN
!! The digit strings ending in digit 7 pronounced as number
!!€ 7:
!!€ 7:t:
!!€ 7:ssä:
0  DIGITS_COMPOUND   ;
+Sg+Nom:0    #   ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS    ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT   ;
+Pl+Nom:%:t DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Gen:%:n DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Par:%:ää    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ill:%:ään   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_OPT ;
+Sg+Abe:%:ttä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Abl:%:ltä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ade:%:llä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+All:%:lle   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ela:%:stä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ess:%:nä    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ine:%:ssä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:ksi   DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Tra:%:kse   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
+Pl+Par:%:iä    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ill:%:iin   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_OPT ;
+Pl+Abe:%:ittä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Abl:%:iltä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ade:%:illä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+All:%:ille  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ess:%:inä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Cmt:%:ine  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ela:%:istä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ine:%:issä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ins:%:in    DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:iksi  DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:ikse  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;

LEXICON DIGITS_KAHDEKSAN
!! The digit strings ending in digit 8 pronounced as number
!!€ 8:
!!€ 8:t:
!!€ 8:ssa:

0  DIGITS_COMPOUND   ;
+Sg+Nom:0    #   ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  DIGITS_BACK_POSS    ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  DIGITS_BACK_CLIT   ;
+Pl+Nom:%:t DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Gen:%:n DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Par:%:aa    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ill:%:aan   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
+Sg+Abe:%:tta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Abl:%:lta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ade:%:lla   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+All:%:lle   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ela:%:sta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ess:%:na    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ine:%:ssa   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:ksi   DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Tra:%:kse   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
+Pl+Par:%:ia    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ill:%:iin   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
+Pl+Abe:%:itta  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Abl:%:ilta  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ade:%:illa  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+All:%:illa  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ess:%:ina   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Cmt:%:ine  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ela:%:issa  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ine:%:issa  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ins:%:in    DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:iksi  DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:ikse  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;

LEXICON DIGITS_YHDEKSÄN
!! The digit strings ending in digit 9 pronounced as number
!!€ 9:
!!€ 9:t:
!!€ 9:ssä:
0  DIGITS_COMPOUND   ;
+Sg+Nom:0    #   ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS    ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT   ;
+Pl+Nom:%:t DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Gen:%:n DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Par:%:ää    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ill:%:ään   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_OPT ;
+Sg+Abe:%:ttä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Abl:%:ltä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ade:%:llä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+All:%:lle   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ela:%:stä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ess:%:nä    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ine:%:ssä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:ksi   DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Tra:%:kse   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
+Pl+Par:%:iä    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ill:%:iin   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_OPT ;
+Pl+Abe:%:ittä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Abl:%:iltä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ade:%:illä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+All:%:ille  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ess:%:inä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Cmt:%:ine  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ela:%:istä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ine:%:issä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ins:%:in    DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:iksi  DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:ikse  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OBL    ;

LEXICON DIGITS_NOLLA
!! The digit strings ending in digit 0 pronounced as number
!!€ 0:
!!€ 0:t:
!!€ 0:aa:
0  DIGITS_COMPOUND   ;
+Sg+Nom:0    #   ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  DIGITS_BACK_POSS    ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  DIGITS_BACK_CLIT   ;
+Pl+Nom:%:t DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Gen:%:n DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Par:%:aa    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ill:%:aan   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
+Sg+Abe:%:tta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Abl:%:lta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ade:%:lla   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+All:%:lle   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ela:%:sta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ess:%:na    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ine:%:ssa   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:ksi   DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Tra:%:kse   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
+Pl+Par:%:ia    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ill:%:iin   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
+Pl+Abe:%:itta  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Abl:%:ilta  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ade:%:illa  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+All:%:ille  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ess:%:ina   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Cmt:%:ine  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ela:%:ista  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ine:%:issa  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ins:%:in    DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:iksi  DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:ikse  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OBL    ;

LEXICON DIGITS_KYMMENEN
!! The digit string ending in 0 pronounced as tens
!!€ 10:
!!€ 10:t:
!!€ 10:tä:
0  DIGITS_COMPOUND   ;
+Sg+Nom:0    #   ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS    ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT   ;
+Pl+Nom:%:t DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Gen:%:n DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Par:%:tä    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ill:%:een   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_OPT ;
+Sg+Abe:%:ttä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Abl:%:ltä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ade:%:llä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+All:%:lle   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ela:%:stä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ess:%:nä    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ine:%:ssä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:ksi   DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Tra:%:kse   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
+Pl+Par:%:iä    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ill:%:iin   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_OPT ;
+Pl+Abe:%:ittä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Abl:%:iltä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ade:%:illä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+All:%:ille  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ess:%:inä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Cmt:%:ine  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ela:%:istä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ine:%:issä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ins:%:in    DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:iksi  DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:ikse  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OBL    ;
