src/morphology/stems/digits.lexc
LEXICON DIGITS_INT_LOOP
6+Num+Card:6   DIGITS_KUUSI ;
7+Num+Card:7   DIGITS_SEITSEMÄN ;
8+Num+Card:8   DIGITS_KAHDEKSAN ;
9+Num+Card:9   DIGITS_YHDEKSÄN  ;
1%0+Num+Card:1%0  DIGITS_KYMMENEN  ;
2%0+Num+Card:2%0  DIGITS_KYMMENEN  ;
3%0+Num+Card:3%0  DIGITS_KYMMENEN  ;
4%0+Num+Card:4%0  DIGITS_KYMMENEN  ;
5%0+Num+Card:5%0  DIGITS_KYMMENEN  ;
6%0+Num+Card:6%0  DIGITS_KYMMENEN  ;
7%0+Num+Card:7%0  DIGITS_KYMMENEN  ;
8%0+Num+Card:8%0  DIGITS_KYMMENEN  ;
9%0+Num+Card:9%0  DIGITS_KYMMENEN  ;
